Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Merger, Consolidation, and Conversion of Corporation Into Cooperative.

Sec. 10.15.400.
Merger and consolidation.

Two or more cooperatives may merge or consolidate pursuant to a plan of merger or consolidation adopted in the manner provided in AS

10.15.405

—

10.15.415

.

History.

(§ 45(1) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.405.
Approval and contents of plan of merger or consolidation.

The board of each cooperative shall, by resolution adopted by each board, approve a plan of merger or consolidation setting forth

the names of the cooperatives proposing to merge or consolidate, and the name of the cooperative into which they propose to merge or the name of the new cooperative into which they propose to consolidate;

the terms and conditions of the proposed merger or consolidation;

the effect of the proposed merger or consolidation on all members and shareholders of each of the cooperatives;

in the case of a plan for consolidation, the articles of the new cooperative, which must include all of the statements required to be set forth in articles for cooperatives organized under this chapter;

other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or consolidation considered necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 45(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.410.
Adoption of plan of merger or consolidation.

The board of each cooperative, upon approving the plan of merger or plan of consolidation, shall by resolution direct that the plan be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members and shareholders, or if there are no shareholders at an annual or a special meeting of members.
Written notice shall be given to each member and each shareholder in the manner provided in this chapter for meetings of members, and adoption of the plan shall be by affirmative vote of a majority of the member votes cast and affirmative vote of a majority of shareholder votes entitled to be cast.

History.

(§ 45(3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.415.
Abandonment of plan of merger or consolidation.

After adoption of the plan, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned under provisions, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 45(4) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.420.
Execution of articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon adoption of the plan of merger or consolidation, articles of merger or articles of consolidation, as the case may be, shall be executed in duplicate by each cooperative by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary.

History.

(§ 46(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 23 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.15.425.
Contents of articles.

The articles of merger or consolidation must set out

the plan of merger or plan of consolidation;

the date of adoption of the plan;

as to each cooperative, the number of member votes cast for and against the plan;

as to each cooperative, the number, if any, of shareholders, the number of shareholder votes entitled to be voted on the plan, and the number of shareholder votes cast for and against the plan.

History.

(§ 46(1) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.430.
Filing of articles.

Duplicate originals of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the commissioner, who, upon finding the articles conform to law, shall, when all fees and charges prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

endorse on each duplicate original the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

file one of the duplicate originals in the commissioner’s office;

issue and deliver to the surviving or new cooperative or to its representative, a certificate of merger or a certificate of consolidation to which the commissioner shall affix the other duplicate original, and the merger or consolidation is effective upon the issuance of the certificate.

History.

(§ 46(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.435.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

When the merger or consolidation is effective

the several cooperatives which are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single cooperative, which, in case of a merger, shall be that cooperative designated in the plan of merger as the surviving cooperative, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new cooperative provided for in the plan of consolidation;

the separate existence of all cooperatives which are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new cooperative, ceases;

the surviving or new cooperative possesses all the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises of a public or a private nature of each of the merging or consolidating cooperatives; and all property, real, personal and mixed, all debts due on whatever account, including subscriptions to shares, all other choses in action, and all and every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the cooperatives merged or consolidated are transferred to and vested in the single cooperative without further act or deed; and the title to real estate or any interest in real estate vested in the cooperatives does not revert or is not in any way impaired by reason of the merger or consolidation;

the surviving or new cooperative is thereafter responsible and liable for the liabilities and obligations of each of the cooperatives merged or consolidated; and any existing claim or pending action or proceeding by or against the cooperatives may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving or new cooperative may be substituted in its place; and the rights of creditors and liens upon the property of a cooperative are not impaired by the merger or consolidation;

in the case of a merger, the articles of the surviving cooperative are considered amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles are stated in the plan of merger; and in case of a consolidation, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation which are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of cooperatives organized under this chapter are considered the original articles of the new cooperative.

History.

(§ 47 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.440.
Merger or consolidation of cooperatives and domestic and foreign corporations.

One or more cooperatives may merge or consolidate with or into one or more of the following classes of business organizations:

a domestic corporation if the domestic corporation complies with AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) relating to merger or consolidation;

a foreign cooperative if the merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which the foreign cooperative is organized and the foreign cooperative complies with the applicable provisions of those laws;

a foreign business corporation if the merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which the foreign corporation is organized and the foreign corporation complies with the applicable provisions of those laws.

Each cooperative merging or consolidating under this section shall comply with the provisions of this chapter relating to merger or consolidation.

If the surviving or new business corporation or cooperative, as the case may be, is governed by the laws of another state, it shall comply with the provisions of the AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) with respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 48(1) — (3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporations Act (AS 10.05)” in subsections (a)(1) and (c) to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.445.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

If the surviving or new corporation is a cooperative, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as provided in this chapter for the merger or consolidation of cooperatives.

If the surviving or new corporation is a domestic corporation, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) for the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations.

If the surviving or new corporation or cooperative is governed by the laws of another state, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of cooperatives or domestic corporations, as the case may be, except insofar as the laws of the other state provide otherwise.

History.

(§ 48(4) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” in subsection (b) to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.450.
Conversion of corporation into cooperative. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 10.15.455.
Definitions.

In AS

10.15.400

—

10.15.455

,

“new cooperative” means the new cooperative provided for in the plan of consolidation;

“surviving cooperative” means the cooperative designated in the plan of merger as the surviving cooperative.

History.

(§ 44 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 2013)